Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 5
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ENTITIES

27-50-501. Behavioral health entities - license required - criminal and civil penalties.

On and after July 1, 2024, it is unlawful for any person, partnership, association, or corporation to conduct or maintain a behavioral health entity, including a substance use disorder program or alcohol use disorder program, without having obtained a license from the BHA.

On and after July 1, 2023, an entity seeking initial licensure as a behavioral health entity shall apply for a behavioral health entity license from the BHA if the entity would previously have been licensed or subject to any of the following:

Behavioral health entity licensure by the department of public health and environment;

Approval or designation by the office of behavioral health, as it existed before July 1, 2022, or the BHA pursuant to this article 50 or article 66 of this title 27; or

Approval by the office of behavioral health, as it existed before July 1, 2022, or the BHA pursuant to section 27-81-106 as an approved treatment program for substance use disorders.

A facility with a license or approval on or before June 30, 2023, as a behavioral health entity or a substance use disorder program, shall apply for a behavioral health entity license prior to the expiration of the facility's current license or approval. Such a facility is subject to the standards under which it is licensed or approved as of July 1, 2023, until such time as the BHA's behavioral health entity license is issued or denied.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars but not more than five hundred dollars and may be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the BHA of not less than fifty dollars but not more than one hundred dollars for each day the person is in violation of this section. The assessed penalty accrues from the date the BHA finds that the person is in violation of this section. The BHA shall assess, enforce, and collect the penalty in accordance with article 4 of title 24 and credit the money to the general fund. Enforcement and collection of the penalty occurs following the decision reached in accordance with procedures set forth in section 24-4-105.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the BHA shall not issue or renew any license described in this part 5 unless the BHA receives a certificate of compliance for the applicant's building or structure from the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety in accordance with part 12 of article 33.5 of title 24.

The BHA shall take action on an application for licensure within thirty days after the date that the BHA receives from the applicant all of the necessary information and documentation required for licensure, including a certificate of compliance from the division of fire prevention and control.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1469, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-502. Behavioral health entities - minimum standard - rules.

No later than April 30, 2023, the BHA shall promulgate rules pursuant to section 24-4-103 providing minimum standards for the operation of behavioral health entities within the state, including the following:

Requirements to be met by all behavioral health entities to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of all behavioral health entity consumers, including, at a minimum:

Requirements for consumer assessment, treatment, care coordination, patient rights, and consumer notice;

Administrative and operational standards for governance; consumer records and record retention; personnel; admission and discharge criteria; policies and procedures to ensure compliance with regulatory and contract requirements; and quality management;

Data reporting requirements;

Physical plant standards, including infection control; and

Occurrence reporting requirements pursuant to section 27-50-510;

Service-specific requirements that apply only to behavioral health entities electing to provide that service or set of services, including, at a minimum, standards for the specific types of behavioral health safety net services and other behavioral health services along the continuum of care created by the BHA pursuant to part 3 of this article 50, including but not limited to:

Essential behavioral health safety net provider standards; and

Comprehensive community behavioral health provider standards;

Procedures for mandatory BHA inspections of behavioral health entities;

Procedures for written plans for a behavioral health entity to correct violations found as a result of inspections;

Intermediate enforcement remedies;

Factors for behavioral health entities to consider when determining whether an applicant's conviction of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense disqualifies the applicant from employment with the behavioral health entity. The state board of human services may determine which offenses require consideration of these factors.

Timelines for compliance with behavioral health entity standards that exceed the standards under which a behavioral health entity was previously licensed or approved.

In approving or rejecting an essential behavioral health safety net provider for eligibility for enhanced service delivery payment, the commissioner shall:

Require training on and provision of culturally competent and trauma-informed services;

Consider the adequacy and quality of the services provided, taking into consideration factors such as geographic location, local community need, and availability of workforce;

Require written policies and procedures on admitting, discharging, triaging, and denying services to clients in alignment with the standards determined by the BHA pursuant to sections 27-50-302 and 27-50-303;

Require that overall responsibility for the administration of an essential behavioral health safety net provider be vested in a director who is a physician or a member of one of the licensed mental health professions, unless the provider is only providing recovery support services. If the director is not a licensed physician or licensed mental health professional, the provider shall employ or contract with at least one licensed physician or licensed mental health professional to advise the director on clinical decisions.

Require that essential behavioral health safety net provider staff include, wherever feasible and appropriate in the discretion of the commissioner, medical staff able to provide medical clearance on site, and other professional staff workers such as psychologists, social workers, educational consultants, peers, community health workers, and nurses, with such qualifications, responsibilities, and experience that corresponds with the size and capacity of the provider; and

Require that each essential behavioral health safety net provider from which services may be purchased:

Be under the control and direction of a county or local board of health, a board of directors or board of trustees of a corporation, a for-profit or not-for-profit organization, a regional mental health board, or a political subdivision of the state;

Be free of conflicts of interest; and

Enter into a contract developed pursuant to section 27-50-203 and accept publicly funded clients.

In approving or rejecting a comprehensive community behavioral health provider for eligibility for enhanced service delivery payment, the commissioner shall adhere to the standards for essential behavioral health safety net providers established in subsection (2) of this section, and the commissioner shall also:

Require that treatment programs of the comprehensive community behavioral health provider be vested in a director who is a physician or a member of one of the licensed mental health professions. The director is not required to provide oversight or direction for recovery services. If the director is not a physician or licensed mental health professional, the provider shall contract with at least one licensed physician or licensed mental health professional to advise the director on clinical decisions.

Consider whether the comprehensive community behavioral health provider has historically served medically needy or medically indigent patients and demonstrates a commitment to serve low-income and medically indigent populations or, in the case of a sole community provider, serves the medically indigent patients within its medical capability;

Require the comprehensive community behavioral health provider to waive charges or charge for services on a sliding scale based on income and require that the provider not restrict access or services because of an individual's financial limitations;

Require the comprehensive community behavioral health provider to serve priority populations;

Encourage the comprehensive community behavioral health provider to emphasize the care and treatment of individuals recently released from incarceration and hospitals or facilities directed toward assisting individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders in the individual's adjustment to and functioning in the community;

Require a process for tracking and reporting denials of care; and

Require that the board in control and direction of the comprehensive community behavioral health provider include voting members that have lived experience with mental health disorders and substance use disorders and parents of children with mental health disorders and substance use disorders.

In approving or rejecting local general or psychiatric hospitals, nontraditional facilities, innovative care models, and other behavioral health facilities or programs for the purchase or designation of services not provided by essential or comprehensive community behavioral health providers, the commissioner shall consider the following factors:

The general quality of care provided to patients by such agencies;

The organization of the medical staff to provide for the integration and coordination of the psychiatric treatment program;

The provisions for the availability of nursing, psychological, and social services and the existence of an organized program of activities under the direction of an occupational therapist or another qualified person;

The licensure of such entity by the department of public health and environment or another state agency where applicable;

The methods by which the agency coordinates its services with those rendered by other agencies to ensure an uninterrupted continuum of care to individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders; and

The availability of such services to the general public.

In approving or rejecting behavioral health safety net providers pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, or other agencies pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, for the purchase of services, the commissioner shall ensure the behavioral health safety net providers and agencies comply with federal financial participation requirements for department-administered programs.

In addition to these duties, the BHA may promulgate rules related to additional competencies related to serving priority populations. Behavioral health safety net providers approved by the BHA as demonstrating these additional competencies may be eligible for enhanced rates. State agencies shall consider such approved status in determining payment methodologies for services provided.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1471, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-503. Licenses - application - inspection - issuance.

An application for a license to operate a behavioral health entity must be submitted to the BHA annually in the form and manner prescribed by the BHA.

The BHA shall investigate and review each original application and each renewal application for a license to operate a behavioral health entity. The BHA shall determine an applicant's compliance with this article 50 and the rules adopted pursuant to section 27-50-504 before the BHA issues a license.

The BHA shall inspect the applicant's facilities as it deems necessary to ensure that the health, safety, and welfare of the behavioral health entity's consumers are protected. The behavioral health entity shall submit in writing, in a form prescribed by the BHA, a plan detailing the measures that the behavioral health entity will take to correct any violations found by the BHA as a result of inspections undertaken pursuant to this subsection (2).

The BHA shall keep all health-care information or documents obtained during an inspection or investigation of a behavioral health entity pursuant to subsection (2) of this section confidential. Any such records, information, or documents obtained are exempt from disclosure pursuant to sections 24-72-204 and 27-50-510.

With the submission of an application for a license to operate a behavioral health entity, or within ten days after a change in ownership or management of a behavioral health entity, each owner and manager shall submit a complete set of the owner's or manager's fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a fingerprint-based criminal history record check. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. Each owner and each manager shall pay the Colorado bureau of investigation the costs associated with the fingerprint-based criminal history record check. Upon completion of the criminal history record check, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the results to the BHA. The BHA may acquire a name-based criminal history record check for an applicant who has twice submitted to a fingerprint-based criminal history record check and whose fingerprints are unclassifiable.

The BHA shall use the information from the criminal history record checks performed pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section to determine whether the person applying for licensure has been convicted of a crime that involves conduct that the BHA determines could pose a risk to the health, safety, or welfare of a behavioral health entity's consumers. The BHA shall consider that persons in recovery may have a history of criminal justice involvement and that criminal history does not require a dismissal of an application for a license. The BHA shall keep information obtained in accordance with this subsection (4) confidential.

The BHA shall not issue a license to operate a behavioral health entity if the owner or manager of the behavioral health entity has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor that involves conduct that the BHA determines could pose a risk to the health, safety, or welfare of the behavioral health entity's consumers.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the BHA shall issue or renew a license to operate a behavioral health entity when it is satisfied that the applicant or licensee is in compliance with the requirements set forth in this article 50 and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 50. Except for provisional licenses issued in accordance with subsection (7) of this section, a license issued or renewed pursuant to this section expires one year after the date of issuance or renewal.

The BHA may issue a provisional license to operate a behavioral health entity to an applicant for the purpose of operating a behavioral health entity for a period of ninety days if the applicant is temporarily unable to conform to all of the minimum standards required pursuant to this article 50; except that the BHA shall not issue a provisional license to an applicant if the operation of the behavioral health entity will adversely affect the health, safety, or welfare of the behavioral health entity's consumers.

As a condition of obtaining a provisional license, the applicant shall show proof to the BHA that attempts are being made to conform and comply with the applicable standards required pursuant to this article 50.

The BHA shall not grant a provisional license prior to the completion of a criminal history background check in accordance with subsection (4) of this section and a determination in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

A second provisional license may be issued, for a like term and fee, to effect compliance. No further provisional licenses may be issued for the current year after the second issuance pursuant to this subsection (7)(d).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1474, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-504. License fees - rules.

By April 30, 2023, the commissioner shall promulgate rules establishing a schedule of fees sufficient to meet the direct and indirect costs of administration and enforcement of this part 5.

The BHA shall assess and collect, from behavioral health entities subject to licensure pursuant to section 27-50-503, fees in accordance with the fee schedule established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The BHA shall transmit fees collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the behavioral health licensing cash fund created pursuant to section 27-50-506.

Fees collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be used by the BHA to provide technical assistance and education to behavioral health entities related to compliance with Colorado law, in addition to regulatory and administrative functions. The BHA may contract with private entities to assist the BHA in providing technical assistance and education.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1476, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-505. License - denial - suspension - revocation.

When an application for an initial license to operate a behavioral health entity pursuant to section 27-50-503 has been denied by the BHA, the BHA shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial by mailing a notice to the applicant at the address shown on the application. Any applicant aggrieved by a denial may pursue a review as provided in article 4 of title 24, and the BHA shall follow the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24.

The BHA may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of any behavioral health entity that is out of compliance with the requirements of this part 5 or the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 5. Suspension, revocation, or refusal must not occur until after a hearing and in compliance with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24.

The BHA may impose intermediate restrictions or conditions on a behavioral health entity that may include at least one of the following:

Retaining a consultant to address corrective measures;

Monitoring by the BHA for a specific period;

Providing additional training to employees, owners, or operators of the behavioral health entity;

Complying with a directed written plan to correct the violation; or

Paying a civil fine not to exceed two thousand dollars in a calendar year.

The assessment of civil fines shall follow the procedures set forth in section 26.5-5-323.

If the BHA assesses a civil fine pursuant to subsection (3)(e) of this section, the BHA shall transmit the money to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1476, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-506. Behavioral health licensing cash fund - creation.

The behavioral health licensing cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 27-50-504 (2). The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the BHA in performing its duties pursuant to this part 5. At the end of any state fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund and must not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1477, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-507. Employee and contracted service provider - criminal history record check.

A behavioral health entity shall require an applicant seeking employment with, or seeking to contract to provide services for, the behavioral health entity to submit to a criminal history record check before employment or execution of a contract. The behavioral health entity shall pay the costs of the criminal history record check. The criminal history record check must be conducted not more than ninety days before the employment of or contract with the applicant.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1477, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-508. Enforcement.

The BHA is responsible for the enforcement of this article 50 and the rules adopted pursuant to this article 50.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1477, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-509. Purchase of services by courts, counties, municipalities, school districts, and other political subdivisions.

Any county, city and county, municipality, school district, health service district, or other political subdivision of the state or any county, city and county, district, or juvenile court may enter into intergovernmental agreements with any county, municipality, school district, health service district, or other political subdivision of the state or may enter into contractual agreements with any provider licensed by the BHA for the purchase of behavioral health services. For the purchase of behavioral health services by counties or cities and counties as authorized by this section, the board of county commissioners of any county or the city council of any city and county may levy a tax not to exceed two mills upon real property within the county or city and county if the board first submits the question of the levy to a vote of the qualified electors at a general election and receives the electors' approval of the levy.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1477, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-510. Behavioral health entities - consumer information - reporting - release - rules.

Each behavioral health entity licensed, approved, or designated pursuant to this part 5 shall report to the BHA all of the following occurrences:

Any occurrence that results in the death of a patient or resident of the facility and is required to be reported to the coroner pursuant to section 30-10-606, as arising from an unexplained cause or under suspicious circumstances;

Any occurrence that results in any of the following serious injuries to a patient or resident:

Brain or spinal cord injuries;

Life-threatening complications of anesthesia or life-threatening transfusion errors or reactions; or

Second- or third-degree burns involving twenty percent or more of the body surface area of an adult patient or resident or fifteen percent or more of the body surface area of a child patient or resident;

Any occurrence when a patient or resident of the facility cannot be located following a search of the facility, the facility grounds, and the area surrounding the facility, and:

There are circumstances that place the patient's or resident's health, safety, or welfare at risk; or

The patient or resident has been missing for eight hours;

Any occurrence involving physical, sexual, or verbal abuse of a patient or resident, as described in section 18-3-202, 18-3-203, 18-3-204, 18-3-206, 18-3-402, 18-3-404, or 18-3-405, by another patient or resident, an employee of the facility, or a visitor to the facility;

Any occurrence involving caretaker neglect of a patient or resident, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (2.3);

Any occurrence involving misappropriation of a patient's or resident's property. As used in this subsection (1)(f), "misappropriation of a patient's or resident's property" means a pattern of or deliberately misplacing, exploiting, or wrongfully using, either temporarily or permanently, a patient's or resident's belongings or money without the patient's or resident's consent.

Any occurrence in which drugs intended for use by patients or residents are diverted to use by other persons. If the diverted drugs are injectable, the behavioral health entity shall also report the full name and date of birth of any individual who diverted the injectable drugs, if known.

Any occurrence involving the malfunction or intentional or accidental misuse of patient or resident care equipment that occurs during treatment or diagnosis of a patient or resident and that significantly adversely affects or, if not averted, would have significantly adversely affected a patient or resident of the facility.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules specifying the manner, time period, and form in which the reports required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be made.

Any report submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is strictly confidential; except that information in any such report may be transmitted to an appropriate regulatory agency having jurisdiction for disciplinary or license sanctions. The information in such reports shall not be made public upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The BHA shall investigate each report submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that the BHA determines was appropriately submitted. For each report investigated, the BHA shall prepare a summary of its findings, including the BHA's conclusions and whether there was a violation of licensing or approval standards or a deficiency and whether the facility acted appropriately in response to the occurrence. If the investigation is not conducted on site, the BHA shall specify in the summary how the investigation was conducted. Any investigation conducted pursuant to this subsection (4) is in addition to and not in lieu of any inspection required to be conducted pursuant to section 27-50-503 (2) with regard to licensing.

The BHA shall make the following information available to the public:

Any investigation summaries prepared pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

Any complaints against a behavioral health entity that have been filed with the BHA and that the BHA has investigated, including the conclusions reached by the BHA and whether there was a violation of licensing or approval standards or a deficiency and whether the facility acted appropriately in response to the subject of the complaint; and

A listing of any deficiency citations issued against each behavioral health entity.

The information released pursuant to this subsection (5) shall not identify the patient or resident or the health-care professional involved in the report.

Prior to the completion of an investigation pursuant to this section, the BHA may respond to any inquiry regarding a report received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section by confirming that it has received such report and that an investigation is pending.

In addition to the report to the BHA for an occurrence described in subsection (1)(d) of this section, the occurrence must be reported to a law enforcement agency.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1478, § 1, effective July 1.